Utah statutes.
4-17-5.   County weed control board responsible for control of noxious weeds
-- Cooperation with other county boards -- Authority to designate noxious weed
-- Public hearing before removal of noxious weed from state list.
(1)  A county weed control board is responsible, under the general direction
of the county executive, for the formulation and implementation of a county-
wide coordinated noxious weed control program designed to prevent and control
noxious weeds within its county.
(2)  A county weed control board is required, under the general direction of
its commission, to cooperate with other county weed control boards to prevent
and control the spread of noxious weeds.
(3)  A county legislative body may declare a particular weed or competitive
plant, not appearing on the state noxious weed list, a county noxious weed
within its county, or  the county executive, with the approval of the county
legislative body, may petition the commissioner for removal of a particular
noxious weed from the state noxious weed list.  The county legislative body
may not approve a petition of the county executive to the commissioner to
remove a noxious weed unless it has first conducted a public hearing after due
notice.
